Maine, session 132, LD708.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §489-C, sub-§1, as amended by PL 1995, c. 493, §9, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
1. Development other than a subdivision. For a development other than a
subdivision as defined at the time of permit issuance:
A. The permittee has not constructed or caused to be constructed, or operated or caused
to be operated, the development; or
B. The development has been fully decommissioned to the department's satisfaction;
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §489-C, as corrected by RR 1995, c. 2, §99, is amended by
enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
For the purposes of this section, "fully decommissioned" means all aboveground and
belowground components of a development have been physically removed, the site has
been restored to preconstruction grade, any previously vegetated areas have been
revegetated with native vegetation similar to nearby native vegetation and all waste has
been recycled or disposed of at a facility authorized to accept the materials for recycling or
disposal.
Page 1 - 132LR0169(03)